Georgia, session 2025_26, SB71.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to income taxes,
is amended by adding a new paragraph to subsection (a) of Code Section 48-7-27, relating
to computation of taxable net income, to read as follows:
"(11.3) Income received pursuant to Code Section 20-3-681 by a student athlete at a
postsecondary educational institution as compensation for the use of his or her name,
image, or likeness, to the extent such income is included in the taxpayer's federal adjusted
gross income and is not otherwise exempt from the tax imposed by this article under any
other provision of law;"
S. B. 71
- 1 -

LC 50 0945
SECTION 2.
This Act shall be applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 71
- 2 -